Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.050

Records committee—Composition, travel expenses, meetings, powers and duties—Retention schedules.

There is created a committee, to be known as the records committee, composed of the archivist, an appointee of the state auditor, an appointee of the attorney general, and an appointee of the director of financial management. Committee members shall serve without additional salary, but shall be entitled to travel expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended. Such expenses shall be paid from the appropriations made for operation of their respective departments or offices.

The records committee shall meet at least once every quarter or oftener as business dictates. Action by the committee shall be by majority vote and records shall be kept of all committee business.

It shall be the duty of the records committee to approve, modify or disapprove the recommendations on retention schedules of all files of public records and to act upon requests to destroy any public records: PROVIDED, That any modification of a request or recommendation must be approved by the head of the agency originating the request or recommendation.

The division of archives and records management shall provide forms, approved by the records committee, upon which it shall prepare recommendations to the committee in cooperation with the records officer of the department or other agency whose records are involved.

[ 1985 c 192 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 83; 1957 c 246 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.